South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S174.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-21-870(B)(1)(b) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (b) operate, be in possession of, or give permission to operate a Class "A" motor boatvessel, as defined in Section 50-21-10(25), while upon the waters of this State unless each person under the age of twelve thirteen aboard the Class "A" motor boatvessel is wearing a United States Coast Guard approved personal flotation device, Type I, Type II, Type III, or Type V, unless the person under the age of thirteen is in the cabin of the vessel or below deck of the vessel; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----